Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2303
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds and declares that the production of domesticated cervine animals contributes to the strength of the economy of this state. The Legislature further declares that the Department of Agriculture under the powers and duties provided by law for the protection of the health of livestock is the appropriate agency to adopt, promulgate, and enforce rules and regulations necessary to control disease, importation, identification, issuing of permits, containment, and escape of domesticated cervine animals.

Laws 1999, LB 404, § 2.